Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.844

Regents, trustees, officers, employees, or agents of institutions of higher education or educational boards, insurance to protect and hold personally harmless.

The board of regents and the board of trustees of each of the state's institutions of higher education and governing body of an educational board are authorized to purchase insurance to protect and hold personally harmless any regent, trustee, officer, employee, or agent of their respective institution, any member of an educational board, its officers, employees or agents, from any action, claim, or proceeding instituted against him or her arising out of the performance or failure of performance of duties for or employment with such institution or educational board and to hold him or her harmless from any expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or monetary judgments from such actions.

[ 2011 c 336 s 714; 1972 ex.s. c 23 s 3.]

NOTES:

Liability coverage of university personnel and students: RCW 28B.20.250 through 28B.20.255.